Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.281, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. County personnel system. "County personnel system" means all employees in the departments or agencies of county government or joint city and county agencies which receive their funding in whole or in part from the county board, including employees ofnew text begin the following, but excluding other employees not subject to a county personnel system because of state lawnew text end : deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end elected officials; deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the Saint Paul-Ramsey Medical Center Commission; and deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the deleted text begin court administrator of district court;deleted text end new text begin Examiner of Titles.new text end deleted text begin but not including: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) district court judges; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) court reporters, law clerks, referees employed by the district court, and the Second Judicial District administrator's office; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) court commissioners; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) the public defender; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) employees of the Examiner of Titles, Agricultural Extension Service, Humane Society, Historical Society, and Soil and Water Conservation District; and deleted text end deleted text begin (6) other employees not subject to a county personnel system because of state law. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.283, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. deleted text begin Directordeleted text end new text begin Chief human resources officernew text end . The deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin chief human resources officernew text end shall be appointed by the Ramsey County deleted text begin executive directordeleted text end new text begin county managernew text end , on the basis of merit and fitness as a result of a competitive examination, subject to the approval of the county board. The deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin chief human resources officernew text end shall be in the deleted text begin classifieddeleted text end new text begin unclassifiednew text end service deleted text begin and shall report directly to and be supervised by the Ramsey County executive directordeleted text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.283, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Responsibilities. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall provide personnel management services and assistance to all county departments, enforce any personnel rules and regulations adopted by the county board, and carry out the responsibilities set forth in sections 383A.281 to 383A.301. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.284, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Rulemaking. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall prepare rules to implement the provisions of sections 383A.281 to 383A.301. The rules shall be effective upon approval by the county board. Prior to approval, the county board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rules after giving notice to county departments, employees, affected labor organizations, and the public. The rules approved by the county board shall have the force and effect of law. The rules may be amended or repealed in the same manner as originally adopted. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.284, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Collective bargaining. The deleted text begin executive directordeleted text end new text begin county managernew text end or the deleted text begin director'sdeleted text end new text begin county manager'snew text end designee shall be the chief labor negotiator for the county. The deleted text begin executive directordeleted text end new text begin county managernew text end may, as necessary and at discretion, include department heads of affected departments in the labor negotiation process. The deleted text begin executive directordeleted text end new text begin county managernew text end shall recommend to the county board for its final approval all collective bargaining agreements. To the extent they are covered by a collective bargaining agreement, the compensation, term, and conditions of employment for all employees represented by an exclusive representative certified pursuant to chapter 179A shall be governed by the collective bargaining agreement executed by the county board and the parties and it shall supersede any rule or administrative procedure adopted pursuant to sections 383A.281 to 383A.301, unless a provision of the agreement is found to violate other state or federal law. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.284, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. deleted text begin Payroll voucher certificationdeleted text end new text begin Payrolls approvednew text end . The deleted text begin director ofdeleted text end new text begin chiefnew text end human resources new text begin officer new text end or the deleted text begin director'sdeleted text end new text begin officer'snew text end authorized agent shall be responsible for deleted text begin certification of the payroll vouchers that thedeleted text end new text begin payment of salary or compensation ofnew text end persons deleted text begin named in them have beendeleted text end appointed and employed in accordance with the provisions of sections 383A.281 to 383A.301 and the rules under sections 383A.281 to 383A.301. deleted text begin No Ramsey County disbursing or auditingdeleted text end new text begin The chief human resourcesnew text end officer new text begin or the officer's authorized agent new text end shall deleted text begin make or approve or take part in making or approving payment for personal service todeleted text end new text begin not certify a payroll item fornew text end a person holding a position in county service unless the deleted text begin payroll voucher or account for the amount bears the certification of the director or the authorized agentdeleted text end new text begin person has been appointed and employed in accordance with the provisions of sections 383A.281 to 383.301 and the rules under sections 383A.281 to 383A.301new text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.284, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Evaluation; report. The county board shall establish performance indicators and annually monitor the performance of the personnel management system in the county. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall periodically review and evaluate current and future staff needs of all county departments, job classes and descriptions, training and development, and internal and market comparability of all classification and salary schedules and report to the county board on these and other personnel management areas, as requested. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.284, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Review appointments. Prior to each new appointment to the county personnel system, the new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall certify that the person has been appointed in accordance with sections 383A.281 to 383A.301 and applicable rules and regulations. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.285, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Classification plan. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall maintain, revise, and administer a classification and salary plan. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.285, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Classification of positions. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall place each position in the classified service in an appropriate class in the classification plan or in a new class to be created, if appropriate. If a class is unique to a department, the new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall consult the head of that department before classifying the unique positions. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.285, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Appeal from classification or reclassification. An appointing authority or an employee affected by a classification or reclassification of a position may protest the action in writing to the human resources director. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall review the classification or reclassification and may change the decision. Neither the appointing authority nor the employee shall have any further right to appeal a decision regarding a classification or reclassification to the Personnel Review Board. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.285, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Study; implementation. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall complete a reclassification study within 60 days after receiving a reclassification request. The appointing authority shall implement the personnel changes required by the reclassification decision in a timely manner and qualifications for reclassified positions shall be reasonably commensurate with the requirements of the position. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.285, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Unclassifying positions. An employee in the classified service with permanent tenure, who is an incumbent of a position which becomes unclassified and is not appointed to or is removed from the unclassified position, shall be transferred by the new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end to a classified position within the same department comparable to the unclassified position. If a comparable position is unavailable, the person shall be transferred by the deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin chief human resources officernew text end to a classified position comparable to that held immediately prior to being appointed to the position which was unclassified. If the employee held an unclassified position with the same agency before being appointed to the classified position that is unclassified, the person shall be transferred by the deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin chief human resources officernew text end to a classified position comparable to the classified position next in rank below the position that is unclassified. The employee's salary shall not be less than it was in the position which was unclassified, but it may be frozen until it is commensurate with the class and grade of the position to which the employee was transferred. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.286, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Unclassified positions. The following positions shall be in the unclassified service: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end positions held by elected officials or persons appointed to fill an elected office; deleted text begin (b) one assistantdeleted text end new text begin (2) assistantsnew text end for each elected official; deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the director or principal administrative officer of a department of county government or agency created by lawdeleted text begin , except that the affirmative action officer, human resources director, internal auditor, and director of budgeting and accounting shall be positions in the classified servicedeleted text end ; deleted text begin (d) doctors, residents, and student nurses employed by the county or county agency; deleted text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end members of a board or commission appointed by the county, or the county and the city, and acting in an advisory capacity; deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end weed inspectorsdeleted text begin , election judges, or election clerksdeleted text end ; deleted text begin (g) special police officers or special deputy sheriffs serving without pay; deleted text end deleted text begin (h) judges, court administrators, court reporters, receivers, referees, the examiner or assistant examiners of titles, public defenders, arbiters, jurors, court administrator of district court, or persons appointed by the district court to make or conduct a special inquiry of a judicial or temporary character; deleted text end deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end all positions in the Second Judicial District administrator's office; deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end the deleted text begin executive directordeleted text end new text begin county managernew text end and deleted text begin eightdeleted text end principal assistants; deleted text begin (k) the chief executive officer of the medical center and seven principal assistants; deleted text end deleted text begin (l) interns, student workers, law clerks, or other employees employed for a limited duration as determined by the county board; deleted text end deleted text begin (m)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end positions designated by the county board as unclassified pursuant to subdivision 3; deleted text begin (n)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end the sheriff, the sheriff's chief deputy, deleted text begin threedeleted text end principal assistants, and deleted text begin adeleted text end personal deleted text begin secretarydeleted text end new text begin secretariesnew text end ; and deleted text begin (o)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end the county attorney, the county attorney's first assistant, deleted text begin onedeleted text end principal deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin assistantsnew text end , and deleted text begin adeleted text end personal deleted text begin secretarydeleted text end new text begin secretariesnew text end . Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.286, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Unclassified positions authorized by county board. new text begin (a) new text end The county board may designate additional positions in the unclassified service if the following criteria are met: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end designation of the position is not contrary to the provisions of other law relating specifically to that department; deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end the person occupying the position of supervisor or a department assistant would report directly to the department head and would be designated as part of the department head's management team; and deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the duties of the position involve significant discretion and substantial involvement in the development, interpretation, and implementation of department policy. new text begin (b) new text end The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall certify whether the designation is consistent or inconsistent with the standards and criteria in this section. The county board may appeal certification decisions to the Personnel Review Board. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.288, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Waiver of competitive examinations. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall establish a procedure and a definition of the criteria for the selection and referral of qualified applicants to fill positions in routine service classifications involving unskilled tasks. Applicants to fill vacancies in the classifications shall be exempt from ranking and certification. The deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin chief human resources officernew text end shall refer all qualified applicants to the appointing authority having vacancies in the appropriate classifications. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.288, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Classified managerial positions. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall establish criteria for the designation of positions in the classified service as managerial positions where the duties involve significant discretion and substantial involvement in the development, interpretation, and implementation of departmental and county policy. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall designate those classified positions that meet these criteria in consultation with interested parties, including bargaining units certified pursuant to chapter 179A representing Ramsey County employees. Classified positions, so designated, shall be exempt from the examination and certification requirements of this section, and the provisions of section 383A.289, and shall be filled by means of an open application and screening process. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.289, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall prepare eligible lists as provided in this section. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.289, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of eligibility. The term of eligibility of eligibles on lists shall be determined by the new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end . Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.291, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Under county rules. Upon request of the appointing authority, the new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall certify eligibles in accordance with rules adopted under section 383A.284, subdivision 1. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.292, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Temporary appointments. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end may authorize the appointing authority to make a temporary appointment of not more than six months in any 12-month period. When practicable, the human resources director may certify any qualified eligible from an eligible list for the temporary appointment, but may authorize the appointment of any person deemed qualified by the appointing authority. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.292, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Provisional appointments. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end may authorize the appointing authority to make a provisional appointment for a position for which there is no eligible list for a period of time determined by the human resources director not to exceed six months. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.294, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Production of documents. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end may make a written request to an employee to produce relevant documents or to a person to appear for the purpose of giving relevant oral statements or testimony relating to a disciplinary action of an employee. An employee who is the subject of a disciplinary action may make a written request to the new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end for the production of relevant documents or for the appearance of a person to give relevant oral statements or testimony relating to the disciplinary action. The request for the appearance of a person may be to appear and testify at a hearing of the Personnel Review Board or to appear at a specified place to give an oral statement prior to a hearing of the Personnel Review Board. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end , or the employee upon receipt of a request for production of relevant documents, shall furnish the requesting party the documents within ten days of receipt of the written request. A person to whom a request for an appearance has been made shall appear at the time and place designated in the request. If a party to whom a request for relevant documents has been made fails to furnish the documents to the requesting party within ten days of receipt of the request, the requesting party may make an application to the district court for a determination that the refusal to produce the documents was unreasonable. If a person to whom a request for appearance has been made fails to appear at the time and place designated in the request, the party making the request for appearance may make an application to the district court for a determination that the failure to appear was unreasonable. If the district court determines that a failure to produce requested documents or to appear was unreasonable, it may assess costs not exceeding $100 to the requesting party against the refusing party or person. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.295, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Benefits. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall have the authority to set hours of employment, sick leave, vacation leave, leave of absence without pay, health insurance, life insurance, and other fringe benefits for employees in the classified and unclassified service subject to the approval of the county board and in accordance with the law. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383A.295, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Layoffs. The new text begin chief new text end human resources deleted text begin directordeleted text end new text begin officernew text end shall adopt rules and regulations providing for the layoff and reemployment of employees on the basis of the employee's seniority. Sec. 26. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 383A.298; and 383A.301, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end Sec. 27. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective the day after the Ramsey County Board of Commissioners and the county's chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-07690 383A.298 TRANSITIONAL PROVISIONS. All employees of the Civil Service Department shall be transferred to the Human Resources Department. All members of the Civil Service Commission shall be members of the Personnel Review Board and serve until their current term expires and a successor is appointed. 383A.301 STATUS OF PRESENT EMPLOYEES. Each person holding a position with the county of Ramsey who has acquired permanent tenure or who was serving a probationary period on the effective date of sections 383A.281 to 383A.301 retains the position, seniority date, and accrued benefits.